District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.26

Certificate requirement.

(a)

Whenever a request for consent is made pursuant to § 7-1531.24, the hospital or hospice representative making the request shall complete a certificate of request for an anatomical gift on a form to be supplied by the Mayor. The certificate shall include the following:

(1)

A statement indicating that a request for an anatomical gift was made;

(2)

The name and affiliation of the person making the request;

(3)

An indication of whether consent was granted and, if so, what organs and tissues were donated; and

(4)

The name of the person granting or refusing the request, and his or her relationship to the decedent.

(b)

A copy of the certificate described in subsection (a) of this section shall be included in the decedent’s medical record.

History

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 27, 55 DCR 2532

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1531.27.